New Jersey, session 222, A638.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Service member means an individual who is serving on active duty as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard. Veteran means an individual who served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States, a Reserve component thereof, or the National Guard, and who was honorably discharged or released under honorable circumstances from active service. b.    A public institution of higher education shall waive the  tuition and fees of that institution for any service member or veteran living in New Jersey who is the recipient of a Medal of Honor or Purple Heart Medal provided that the service member or veteran has: (1)   been accepted to pursue a course of undergraduate study and is enrolled as an undergraduate student in good standing at that institution; and (2)   applied for all available State student grants and scholarships and all available federal student grants and scholarships for which the service member or veteran is eligible. The service member or veteran shall be permitted to attend regularly-scheduled courses at the institution and receive up to 16 credits per semester tuition-free for a maximum of eight semesters. c.     A service member or veteran shall demonstrate eligibility for waived tuition and fees in a manner and by a date determined by the governing board of the public institution of higher education. 2.    This act shall take effect in the first full academic year following the date of enactment.